District of Columbia statutes.
24-211.41

Authorization of investigation.

(a)

The Director of the Department of Corrections (“Director”) shall conduct, on a biennial basis, National Crime Information Center (“NCIC”) criminal background investigations on all Department employees including non-probationary employees.

(b)

At the Director’s discretion, the Director also may conduct NCIC investigations at unspecified times.

History

June 19, 1998, D.C. Law 12-126, § 2, 45 DCR 1232

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-448.11.

Temporary Addition of Section

Temporary addition of section: Section 2 of D.C. Law 11-230 added this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2 of the Department of Corrections Criminal Background Investigation Authorization Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-444, December 6, 1996, 44 DCR 116), § 2 of the Department of Corrections Criminal Background Investigation Authorization Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-33, March 11, 1997, 44 DCR 1913), § 2 of the Department of Corrections Criminal Background Investigation Authorization Second Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-188, October 30, 1997, 44 DCR 6968), and § 2 of the Department of Corrections Criminal Background Investigation Authorization Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-251, January 29, 1998, 45 DCR 899).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 24-211.61, see § 2902 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).